cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Posilování s činkami > Ruční činky, činky dumbbell a činky kettlebell: Činky dumbbell; Sady činek; Činky kettlebell; Pytle s pískem; Kotouče na činky; Posilovací kužely a palcáty
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Dvigovanje uteži > Proste uteži, utežne ročke in uteži z ročaji: Utežne ročke; Kompleti prostih uteži; Kroglaste uteži z ročaji; Vreče s peskom; Plošče za uteži; Utežene palice in buzdovani
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вдигане на тежести > Свободни тежести, дъмбели и пудовки: Дъмбели; Комплекти свободни тежести; Пудовки; Торби с пясък; Дискове за тежести; Тежки бухалки и боздугани
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Тяжелая атлетика > Свободные веса, гантели и гири: Гантели; Наборы свободных весов; Гири; Мешки с песком; Диски для штанг и гантелей; Тренировочные булавы и кувалды
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ウェイトリフティング・重量挙げ > フリーウェイト、ダンベル、ケトルベル: ダンベル; フリーウェイトセット; ケトルベル; 各種サンドバッグ; ウェイトプレート; ウェイトクラブ・メイス
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Painonnosto > Vapaat painot, käsipainot, kahvakuulat: Käsipainot; Vapaiden painojen sarjat; Kahvakuulat; Hiekkasäkit; Levypainot; Treeninuijat ja voimakeilat
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Cử tạ > Tạ không giới hạn trọng lượng, tạ tay & tạ ấm: Tạ tay; Bộ tạ tự do; Tạ ấm; Bao cát; Tạ đĩa; Tạ chùy & tạ chuông
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vektløfting > Frivekter, hantler og kettlebells: Manualer; Frivektsett; Kettlebells; Sandsekker; Vektplater; Vektkøller og maces
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Sunkioji atletika > Laisvieji svarsčiai, hanteliai ir girės: Hanteliai; Laisvų svorių rinkiniai; Girės; Smėlio maišai; Štangų diskai; Svoriniai klubai ir kūjai
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Gewichtheben > Gewichte, Kurzhanteln und Kettlebells: Kurzhanteln; Freihantel-Sets; Kettlebells; Sandsäcke; Hantelscheiben; Clubbells & Macebells
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 举重 > 配重片、哑铃/壶铃: 哑铃; 自由力量器械套装; 壶铃; 沙袋; 配重盘; 棒铃与印第安铃
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 역기 운동 > 프리웨이트/덤벨/케틀벨: 덤벨; 프리 웨이트 세트; 케틀벨; 샌드백; 바벨 원판 중량; 웨이티드 클럽 및 메이스
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vzpieranie > Činky, jednoručky a kettlebelly: Jednoručky; Súpravy s voľnými váhami; Kettlebelly; Závažia s pieskom; Posilňovacie kotúče; Záťažové palice a palcáty
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 舉重 > 自由重量、啞鈴和壺鈴: 啞鈴; 自由重量訓練套組; 壺鈴; 沙袋; 配重板; 負重棒與訓練錘
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Ridicare de greutăți > Greutăți libere, gantere și kettlebell: Gantere; Seturi de greutăți libere; Kettlebell; Saci cu nisip; Discuri; Măciuci și ghiulele cu greutate
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Levantamiento de pesas > Pesas libres, mancuernas y kettlebells: Mancuernas; Sets de pesas libres; Kettlebells; Sacos de arena; Discos de pesas; Mazas y palos con peso
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Dizanje utega > Podesivi utezi, bučice i girje: Bučice; Kompleti podesivih utega; Girje; Vreće s pijeskom za vježbanje; Ploče s utezima; Palice i buzdovani s utegom
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ยกน้ำหนัก > ฟรีเวท ดัมเบล และเคตเทิลเบล: ดัมเบล; ชุดฟรีเวท; เคตเทิลเบล; กระสอบทราย; แผ่นน้ำหนัก; กระบองและลูกตุ้มถ่วงน้ำหนัก
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Άρση βαρών > Ελεύθερα βάρη, αλτήρες & βαράκια με λαβές: Αλτήρες; Σετ ελεύθερων βαρών; Βαράκια με λαβές; Σάκοι άμμου; Δίσκοι βαρών; Βαριά ρόπαλα και ματσούκια γυμναστικής
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Sollevamento pesi > Pesi, manubri e kettlebell: Dumbbells; Set di pesi liberi; Kettlebells; Sacchi di sabbia; Piatti di peso; Clave e mazze zavorrate
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Gewichtheffen > Losse gewichten, halters en kettlebells: Halters; Vrijegewichtensets; Kettlebells; Zandzakken; Gewichtsplaten; Verzwaarde clubs en maces
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Levantamento de peso > Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells: Halteres; Conjuntos de pesos livres; Kettlebells; Sacos de areia; Anilhas de peso; Clavas e maças de peso
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Halterofilismo > Pesos livres, halteres e kettlebells: Halteres; Conjuntos de pesos livres; Kettlebells; Sacos de areia; Placas de peso; Maças e bastões com pesos
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Weight Lifting > Free Weights, Dumbbells & Kettlebells: Dumbbells; Free Weight Sets; Kettlebells; Sandbags; Weight Plates; Weighted Clubs & Maces
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Podnoszenie ciężarów > Ciężarki, hantle i odważniki siłowe: Hantle; Zestawy wolnych ciężarów; Odważniki siłowe; Sandbags; Talerze na sztangę; Maczugi i młoty treningowe
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Súlyemelés > Szabadsúlyok, kézisúlyzók és kettlebellek: Kézisúlyzók; Szabad súlyos készletek; Kettlebellek; Homokzsákok; Súlylemezek; Súlyozott edzőbuzogányok és -kalapácsok
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Haltérophilie > Poids libres, haltères et kettlebells: Haltères; Kits de poids libres; Kettlebells; Sacs de sable; Plaques d’haltérophilie; Massues et masses lestées
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ağırlık Kaldırma > Serbest Ağırlıklar, Dambıllar ve Kettlebell'ler: Dambıllar; Serbest ağırlık setleri; Kettlebell’ler; Kum Torbaları; Ağırlık Plakaları; Ağırlıklı lobutlar ve gürzler
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Styrketräning > Fria vikter, hantlar och kettlebells: Hantlar; Friviktsset; Kettlebells; Sandsäckar; Viktskivor; Viktklubbor och maces
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vægtløftning > Frivægte, håndvægte og kettlebells: Håndvægte; Sæt med frivægte; Kettlebells; Sandsække; Vægtplader; Træningskøller og maces